Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.dic
antislash/A*() po:nom is:mas
baby/A.() po:nom is:mas
baligander/a0p.() po:v1i
barman/A.() po:nom is:mas
baronner/a0p+() po:v1t
bêler/a0p.() po:v1i
bigorner/a0p+() po:v1tp
blackbouler/a0p+() po:v1t
body/A.() po:nom is:mas
bonifier/a0p+() po:v1tp
boss/A.() po:nom is:epi
bouliner/a0p+() po:v1t
box/A.() po:nom is:mas
brandiller/a0p+() po:v1it
brandy/A.() po:nom is:mas
broadcaster/a0p+() po:v1t
brunch/A.() po:nom is:mas
buggy/A.() po:nom is:mas
bull-finch/A.() po:nom is:mas
bush/A.() po:nom is:mas
businessman/A.() po:nom is:mas
businesswoman/A.() po:nom is:fem
buvoter/a0p.() po:v1i
caillouter/a0p+() po:v1t
cameraman/A.() po:nom is:mas
cancériser/a0p+() po:v1p
carapater/a0p+() po:v1p
car-ferry/A.() po:nom is:mas
casser/a0p+() po:v1itp
certifier/a0p+() po:v1t
charcuter/a0p+() po:v1tp
cherry/A.() po:nom is:mas
chevronner/a0p+() po:v1t
chorégraphier/a0p+() po:v1it
clacher/a0p+() po:v1t
clash/A.() po:nom is:mas
clergyman/A.() po:nom is:mas
clochardiser/a0p+() po:v1tp
coach/A.() po:nom is:mas
cogiter/a0p+() po:v1it
commémorer/a0p+() po:v1t
compter/a0p+() po:v1itp
congratuler/a0p+() po:v1tp
contempler/a0p+() po:v1tp
contremarquer/a0p+() po:v1t
convoler/a0p.() po:v1i
cosser/a0p.() po:v1i
coutoner/a0p+() po:v1t
cranberry/A.() po:nom is:fem
crash/A.() po:nom is:mas
créosoter/a0p+() po:v1t
cross-country/A.() po:nom is:mas
croûtonner/a0p+() po:v1p
cyclo-cross/A.() po:nom is:mas
dandiner/a0p+() po:v1tp
dandy/A.() po:nom is:mas
débiner/a0p+() po:v1tp
débrouiller/a0p+() po:v1tp
décimer/a0p+() po:v1t
décrocher/a0p+() po:v1itp
défriser/a0p+() po:v1t
déjuger/a0p+() po:v1p
démieller/a0p+() po:v1t
dépassionner/a0p+() po:v1t
dérager/a0p.() po:v1i
désarçonner/a0p+() po:v1t
déséquiper/a0p+() po:v1tp
dessouder/a0p+() po:v1tp
dévier/a0p+() po:v1it
dinghy/A.() po:nom is:mas
disloquer/a0p+() po:v1tp
driller/a0p+() po:v1t
ecstasy/A*() po:nom is:fem
fenêtrer/a0p+() po:v1t
ferry/A.() po:nom is:mas
flash/A.() po:nom is:mas
flinguer/a0p+() po:v1itp
flush/A.() po:nom is:mas
fourrer/a0p+() po:v1tp
gabionner/a0p+() po:v1t
gagman/A.() po:nom is:mas
garden-party/A.() po:nom is:fem
gentleman/A.() po:nom is:mas
gentry/A.() po:nom is:fem
givrer/a0p+() po:v1tp
graticuler/a0p+() po:v1t
grizzly/A.() po:nom is:mas
hacher/a0p+() po:v1t
hippy/A.() po:nom po:adj is:epi
hobby/A.() po:nom is:mas
husky/A.() po:nom is:mas
javelliser/a0p+() po:v1t
jazzman/A.() po:nom is:mas
jet-society/A.() po:nom is:fem
juke-box/A.() po:nom is:mas
junky/A.() po:nom is:epi
kiffer/a0p+() po:v1t
lady/A.() po:nom is:fem
lardonner/a0p+() po:v1t
lavatory/A.() po:nom is:mas
lobby/A.() po:nom is:mas
loquer/a0p+() po:v1tp
lorry/A.() po:nom is:mas
lunch/A.() po:nom is:mas
mail-coach/A.() po:nom is:mas
manger/a0p+() po:v1tp
match/A.() po:nom is:mas
materner/a0p+() po:v1t
microfilmer/a0p+() po:v1t
midshipman/A.() po:nom is:mas
miss/A.() po:nom is:fem
motamoter/a0p.() po:v1i
négliger/a0p+() po:v1tp
nursery/A.() po:nom is:fem
ombudsman/A*() po:nom is:mas
palanquer/a0p+() po:v1it
passionner/a0p+() po:v1tp
penalty/A.() po:nom is:mas
penny/A.() po:nom is:mas
perchman/A.() po:nom is:mas
permanenter/a0p+() po:v1t
pinailler/a0p.() po:v1i
pitch/A.() po:nom is:mas
pochetronner/a0p+() po:v1p
policeman/A.() po:nom is:mas
pratiquer/a0p+() po:v1itp
procurer/a0p+() po:v1tp
proxy/A.() po:nom is:mas
questionner/a0p+() po:v1tp
raisonner/a0p+() po:v1itîp
ranch/A.() po:nom is:mas
rash/A.() po:nom is:mas
ravager/a0p+() po:v1t
recalibrer/a0p+() po:v1t
recordman/A.() po:nom is:mas
recordwoman/A.() po:nom is:fem
recréer/a0p+() po:v1tp
refacturer/a0p+() po:v1it
réinterroger/a0p+() po:v1tp
remix/A.() po:nom is:mas
rempailler/a0p+() po:v1t
réorienter/a0p+() po:v1tp
résorber/a0p+() po:v1tp
revendiquer/a0p+() po:v1itp
ronfler/a0p.() po:v1i
rugbyman/A.() po:nom is:mas
rush/A.() po:nom is:mas
saluer/a0p+() po:v1tp
sandwich/A.() po:nom is:mas
scotch/A.() po:nom is:mas
scratch/A.() po:nom is:mas
seconder/a0p+() po:v1t
self-made-man/A.() po:nom is:mas
self-made-woman/A.() po:nom is:fem
sketch/A.() po:nom is:mas
slash/A.() po:nom is:mas
smash/A.() po:nom is:mas
sniffer/a0p+() po:v1it
soutacher/a0p+() po:v1t
speakeasy/A.() po:nom is:mas
speech/A.() po:nom is:mas
sportsman/A.() po:nom is:mas
substantiver/a0p+() po:v1t
sulky/A.() po:nom is:mas
superman/A.() po:nom is:mas
surfacturer/a0p+() po:v1t
taler/a0p+() po:v1t
tennisman/A.() po:nom is:mas
tenniswoman/A.() po:nom is:fem
tenonner/a0p+() po:v1t
tommy/A.() po:nom is:mas
toronner/a0p+() po:v1t
tory/A.() po:nom is:mas
transmuer/a0p+() po:v1tp
trottiner/a0p.() po:v1i
véhiculer/a0p+() po:v1tp
vivifier/a0p+() po:v1t
wallaby/A.() po:nom is:mas
wattman/A.() po:nom is:mas
whisky/A.() po:nom is:mas
winch/A.() po:nom is:mas
yachtman/A.() po:nom is:mas
yachtsman/A.() po:nom is:mas
yachtswoman/A.() po:nom is:fem
yachtwoman/A.() po:nom is:fem
yeoman/A.() po:nom is:mas
yeomanry/A.() po:nom is:fem
